Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2007
County officers; removal by judicial proceedings; judgment.

The question of fact shall be tried as in other actions, and if the accused is found guilty, judgment shall be entered removing the officer from his office, and declaring the latter vacant, and the clerk shall enter a copy of the judgment in the election book.

R.S.1866, c. 45, § 7, p. 298;

R.S.1913, § 5704;

C.S.1922, § 5034;

C.S.1929, § 26-1707;

R.S.1943, § 23-2007.